Massachusetts, session 194th, S682.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 34. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
electricity, not batteries alone.
of 9

(b) The commission shall provide to an active or retired employee of the commonwealth
who is insured under the group insurance commission coverage for the cost of the rental and
usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother of a newborn infant who is receiving care at an
intensive care or special care nursery, or has cardiac, neurological, or oral anomalies that prevent
direct feeding at the breast, until such time as the infant is discharged, or until the mother is no
longer pumping breastmilk. The multi-user breast pump shall be made available to the user
within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
(c) The commission shall provide to an active or retired employee of the commonwealth
who is insured under the group insurance commission, and eligible for a covered multi-user
breast pump under this section, coverage for: (i) periodic replacement parts for the multi-user
breast pump including, but not limited to, connectors, valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and
flanges; (ii) breast milk storage bags; and (iii) microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user
breast pump parts.
(d) The commission shall provide to an active or retired employee of the commonwealth
who is insured under the group insurance commission, and eligible for a covered multi-user
breast pump under this section, coverage for: (i) an initial assessment, instruction and fitting by
an International Board Certified Lactation Consultant (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment,
support and refitting as needed by an IBCLC.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10Q the following section:-
Section 10R. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
of 9

users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
electricity, not batteries alone.
(b) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage
for the cost of the rental and usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother of a newborn
infant who is receiving care at an intensive care or special care nursery, or has cardiac,
neurological, or oral anomalies that prevent direct feeding at the breast, until such time as the
infant is discharged, or until the mother is no longer pumping breastmilk. The multi-user breast
pump shall be made available to the user within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
(c) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide an
individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage for:
(i) periodic replacement parts for the multi-user breast pump including, but not limited to,
connectors, valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and flanges; (ii) breast milk storage bags; and
(iii) microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user breast pump parts.
(d) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
of 9

to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide an
individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage for:
(i) an initial assessment, instruction and fitting by an International Board Certified Lactation
Consultant (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment, support and refitting as needed and prescribed
by provider, by an IBCLC.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47UU the following section:-
Section 47VV. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
electricity, not batteries alone.
(b) Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, delivered or
renewed within the commonwealth, which is considered creditable coverage under section 1 of
chapter 111M, shall provide coverage for the cost of the rental and usage of a multi-user breast
pump by the mother of a newborn infant who is receiving care at an intensive care or special care
nursery, or has cardiac, neurological, or oral anomalies that prevent direct feeding at the breast,
until such time as the infant is discharged, or until the mother is no longer pumping breast milk.
The multi-user breast pump should be made available to the user within 24 hours of maternal
hospital discharge.
of 9

(c) Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, delivered or
renewed within the commonwealth, which is considered creditable coverage under section 1 of
chapter 111M, shall provide an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump
under this section, coverage for: (i) periodic replacement parts for the multi-user breast pump
including, but not limited to, connectors, valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and flanges; (ii)
breast milk storage bags; and (iii) microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user breast pump
parts.
(d) Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, delivered or
renewed within the commonwealth, which is considered creditable coverage under section 1 of
chapter 111M, shall provide an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump
under this section, coverage for: (i) an initial assessment, instruction and fitting by an
International Board Certified Lactation Consultant (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment,
support and refitting as needed and prescribed by provider, by an IBCLC.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8VV the following section:-
Section 8WW. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
electricity, not batteries alone.
of 9

(b) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide
100 coverage for the cost of the rental and usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother of a
101 newborn infant who is receiving care at an intensive care or special care nursery, or has cardiac,
102 neurological, or oral anomalies that prevent direct feeding at the breast, until such time as the
103 infant is discharged, or until the mother is no longer pumping breast milk. The multi-user breast
104 pump shall be made available to the user within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
105 (c) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
106 hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide
107 an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage
108 for: (i) periodic replacement parts for the multi-user breast pump including, but not limited to,
109 connectors, valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and flanges; (ii) breast milk storage bags; and
110 (iii) microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user breast pump parts.
111 (d) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
112 hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide
113 an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage
114 for: (i) an initial assessment, instruction and fitting by an International Board Certified Lactation
115 Consultant (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment, support and refitting as needed and prescribed
116 by provider, by an IBCLC.
117 SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General laws is hereby amended by inserting after
118 section 4VV the following section:-
of 9

119 Section 4WW. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
120 pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
121 users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
122 times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
123 closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
124 system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
125 electricity, not batteries alone.
126 (b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
127 delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for the cost of the
128 rental and usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother of a newborn infant who is receiving
129 care at an intensive care or special care nursery, or has cardiac, neurological, or oral anomalies
130 that prevent direct feeding at the breast, until such time as the infant is discharged, or until the
131 mother is no longer pumping breastmilk. The multi-user breast pump should be made available
132 to the user within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
133 (c) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
134 delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide an individual, who is
135 eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage for: (i) periodic
136 replacement parts for the multi-user breast pump including, but not limited to, connectors,
137 valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and flanges; (ii) breast milk storage bags; and (iii)
138 microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user breast pump parts.
139 (d) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
140 delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide an individual, who is
of 9

141 eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage for: (i) an initial
142 assessment, instruction and fitting by an International Board Certified Lactation Consultant
143 (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment, support and refitting as needed and prescribed by
144 provider, by an IBCLC.
145 SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
146 section 4NN the following section:-
147 Section 4OO. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
148 pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
149 users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
150 times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
151 closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
152 system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
153 electricity, not batteries alone.
154 (b) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed shall
155 provide coverage for the cost of the rental and usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother
156 of a newborn infant who is receiving care at an intensive care or special care nursery, or has
157 cardiac, neurological, or oral anomalies that prevent direct feeding at the breast, until such time
158 as the infant is discharged, or until the mother is no longer pumping breastmilk. The multi-user
159 breast pump should be made available to the user within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
160 (c) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed shall
161 provide an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section,
162 coverage for: (i) periodic replacement parts for the multi-user breast pump including, but not
of 9

163 limited to, connectors, valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and flanges; (ii) breast milk storage
164 bags; and (iii) microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user breast pump parts.
165 (d) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed shall
166 provide an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section,
167 coverage for: (i) an initial assessment, instruction and fitting by an International Board Certified
168 Lactation Consultant (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment, support and refitting as needed and
169 prescribed by provider, by an IBCLC.
of 9